Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1768.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-316 of Title 29, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Legal means of taking deer during primitive (muzzleloading)
firearms season for hunters who have purchased a primitive firearms
hunting license shall be prescribed by regulation by the Oklahoma
Wildlife Conservation Commission. The Commission shall include
modern, non-muzzleloading handguns chambered in .38 special +P
caliber or larger in this list of legal means of taking during
primitive (muzzleloading) firearms season.

Req. No. 10403 Page 1

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10403 JL 01/06/25





















Req. No. 10403 Page 2